Utah statutes.
17-8-3.   Distribution of waters -- Operation of projects.
The duty of distributing the waters of and operating the flood control project
when completed shall rest upon the state engineer of the state of Utah
provided, that the cost of such distribution and operation of the project by
the state engineer shall be borne by the county entering into the cooperative
contract with the United States of America for the construction and the
operation of the flood control project.
